Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 342.815 is amended to read:
342.815. As used in ORS 342.805 to 342.937 unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 342.120,  “administrator” includes any teacher the majority of whose
employed time is devoted to service as a supervisor, principal,  vice principal or director of a de-
partment or the  equivalent in a fair dismissal district but shall not include the superintendent,
deputy superintendent or assistant superintendent of any such  district or any substitute or tempo-
rary teacher employed by such a district.
(2) “Board” means the board of directors of a fair dismissal school district.
[(3) “Contract teacher” means any teacher who has been  regularly employed by a school district for
a probationary period of three successive school years,  and who has been retained for the next suc-
ceeding school year. The district school board may enter into agreements that provide  for a shorter
probationary period of not less than one year for teachers who have satisfied  the three-year
probationary period in another Oregon school district. ]
(3)(a) “Contract teacher” means:
(A) Any teacher who has been regularly employed by a fair dismissal district for an initial
probationary period of three successive school years, and who has been retained for the  next
succeeding school year; or
(B) Any  teacher who has been regularly employed by a fair dismissal district for two
successive years, who  has already satisfied the initial three-year probationary term in an-
other Oregon school district, and who has been retained for the next succeeding school  year.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection,  the district school board may
enter into an agreement for a shorter probationary period of  not less than one year for a
teacher who has satisfied the three-year probationary period  in another Oregon school dis-
trict, and who has been retained for the next succeeding school year.
(4) “District superintendent” means the superintendent of schools of a fair dismissal district  or,
in the absence of the superintendent, the person designated to fulfill  the superintendent’s functions.
(5) “Fair dismissal district” means any common or union high school district or  education ser-
vice district.
(6) “Probationary teacher”  means any teacher employed by a fair dismissal district who is not
a contract teacher.
Enrolled House Bill 2900 (HB 2900-A) Page 1
(7) “Program of assistance for improvement” means a written plan  for a contract teacher that
with reasonable specificity:
(a) Helps teachers adapt  and improve to meet changing demands of the Oregon Educational Act
for the 21st Century in ORS chapter 329 if applicable.
(b) Identifies specific deficiencies in the contract teacher’s conduct or performance.
(c) Sets forth corrective steps the contract teacher may pursue to overcome or correct  the de-
ficiencies.
(d) Establishes the assessment techniques by which the district will measure and determine
whether the teacher has sufficiently corrected the deficiencies to meet district standards.
(8) “Substitute  teacher” means any teacher who is employed to take the place of a probationary
or contract teacher who is temporarily absent.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 342.120, “teacher” means any person who holds a teaching  license or
registration as provided in ORS 342.125 or 342.144 or who  is otherwise authorized to teach in the
public schools of this state and who is employed half-time or more  as an instructor or administrator.
(10) “Temporary teacher” means a teacher employed to fill a position designated as temporary
or experimental  or to fill a vacancy which occurs after the opening of school because of unantic-
ipated enrollment or because of the death, disability, retirement, resignation,  contract nonextension
or dismissal of a contract or probationary teacher.
Passed by House April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2900 (HB 2900-A) Page 2